Arkansas, session 2025, HB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 5, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-5-112. Coverage for licensed counseling for traumatic event —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Firefighter” means a person who is a:
(A) Paid, full-time member of a fire department or
firefighting unit of a public employer and who actively engages in the
fighting of fires on a regular basis;
*JLL203*
03-12-2025 11:09:24 JLL203

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1505
(B) Paid, full-time instructor of the Arkansas Fire
Training Academy; or
(C) Member of the firefighting organization of the:
(i) Arkansas National Guard Robinson Maneuver
Training Center; or
(ii) Arkansas National Guard Fort Chaffee Joint
Maneuver Training Center;
(2) “Licensed counseling” means counseling provided by a
licensed mental health professional;
(3) “Licensed mental health professional” means an individual
who:
(A) Is a licensed:
(i) Psychiatrist;
(ii) Psychologist;
(iii) Mental health professional who holds either a
master’s degree or a doctoral degree related to the mental health profession;
(iv) Advanced practice registered nurse working
within the scope of his or her practice as a mental health nurse practitioner
or a mental health clinical nurse; or
(v) Psychiatric physician assistant working under
the supervision of a licensed physician;
(B) Specializes in trauma and crisis; and
(C) Uses evidence-based treatment options;
(4) “Police officer” means a paid, full-time:
(A) Law enforcement officer engaged in official duty who
is a member of:
(i) A regular police force;
(ii) The Division of Arkansas State Police; or
(iii) The law enforcement organization of the:
(a) Arkansas National Guard Robinson Maneuver
Training Center; or
(b) Arkansas National Guard Fort Chaffee Joint
Maneuver Training Center;
(B) Sheriff or deputy sheriff of a county in this state
who is engaged in official duty; or
(C) Constable or night marshal of a town in this state who
03-12-2025 11:09:24 JLL203

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1505
is engaged in official duty;
(5) “Public employer” means the state, a political subdivision
of the state, or a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an
unincorporated town of the state;
(6) “Public safety employee” means an employee of a public
employer who is a:
(A) Probation officer;
(B) Surveillance officer;
(C) Adult or juvenile detention officer;
(D) Police officer; or
(E) Firefighter; and
(7) “Traumatic event” means a public safety employee’s exposure
in the line of duty to an incident involving:
(A) The extraordinary traumatic bodily injury or death of
a person;
(B) The serious injury, death, abuse, or exploitation of a
minor;
(C) An immediate threat to the life of the public safety
employee or another person; or
(D) A mass casualties event.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a public
employer that employs a public safety employee shall provide coverage for
licensed counseling for a public safety employee who has experienced a
traumatic event.
(2)(A) The coverage required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall include coverage for a public safety employee to participate in
up to twelve (12) licensed counseling visits in a calendar year in which the
public safety employee experiences a traumatic event, regardless of the
number of traumatic events experienced by the public safety employee during
the calendar year.
(B)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii) of
this section, if a public safety employee begins receiving licensed
counseling for which coverage is required under this section on or after July
1 in a year, any licensed counseling visits to which the public safety
employee is entitled under this section that the public safety employee does
not use before the end of the calendar year may be carried over to the
03-12-2025 11:09:24 JLL203

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1505
following calendar year.
(ii) A public safety employee shall not receive more
than eighteen (18) covered licensed counseling visits under this section in a
calendar year.
(C) Licensed counseling allowed under this section may be
provided through telehealth.
(c)(1)(A) A public employer shall pay for all licensed counseling
allowed under this section.
(B) A public employer shall pay a licensed mental health
professional an amount not to exceed the deductibles and conditions under the
public safety employee’s current health benefit plan.
(C) A public safety employee shall provide documentation
to substantiate the amount billed to the public safety employee for licensed
counseling under the public safety employee’s current health benefit plan.
(2) Payment by a public employer for licensed counseling under
this section does not create a presumption that a claim is compensable under
§ 11-9-113 or § 11-9-114.
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a
public employer shall allow a public safety employee to select the licensed
mental health professional who will provide the licensed counseling allowed
under this section.
(2) If a licensed mental health professional declines to provide
licensed counseling to a public safety employee under this section, the
public employer that employs the public safety employee is not required to
secure the services of that licensed mental health professional.
(e) A public employer may satisfy the requirements of this section
through its creation of or participation in a program that:
(1) Provides licensed counseling that meets the requirements of
this section; and
(2) Requires the public employer to provide coverage for
licensed counseling as required under this section.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Acts 2023, No. 537, required public
employers to provide coverage for licensed counseling for public safety
employees who experience a traumatic event in the course of their duties;
03-12-2025 11:09:24 JLL203

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1505
that Acts 2023, No. 537, expired on January 1, 2025, leaving no requirement
in place for public employers to provide coverage for licensed counseling for
public safety employees who experience a traumatic event in the course of
their duties; that it is in the best interest of the state to provide mental
health support for public safety employees who experience traumatic events in
the course of their duties; that mental health services for public safety
employees is important to the public peace, health, and safety as the state
relies on these employees to respond appropriately in an emergency; and that
this act is immediately necessary because coverage for licensed counseling
for public safety employees who experience a traumatic event in the course of
their duties is essential to the continued service of these public safety
employees to ensure the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for
the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Wing













03-12-2025 11:09:24 JLL203